apertium-nld-fry.fry.dix
    <pardef n="si/tte__vblex">
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tten</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ttend</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ttende</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tst</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ietst</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieten</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="r/inne__vblex">
      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûn</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innend</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>innende</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innest</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innet</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ûn</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûnst</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûn</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûnen</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="k/omme__vblex">
      <e><p><l>omme</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omme</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ommen</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ommend</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ommende</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>om</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omst</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omt</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omme</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>aam</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aamst</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aam</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amen</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>om</l><r>omme<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="d/waan__vblex">
      <e><p><l>waan</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>waan</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>waand</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>waande</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>och</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ochst</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ocht</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogge</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iest</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ienen</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>och</l><r>waan<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/izze__vblex">
      <e><p><l>izze</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izze</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ein</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izzend</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>izzende</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>is</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eist</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izze</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eist</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>einen</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eine</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>is</l><r>izze<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sl/iepe__vblex">
      <e><p><l>iepe</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iepe</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iept</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ept</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iepend</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iepende</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iep</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iepst</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>epst</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iept</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ept</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iepe</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iepte</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>epte</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieptst</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eptst</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iepte</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>epte</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iepten</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>epten</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iep</l><r>iepe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>









  </pardefs>

    <e lm="sizze"><i>s</i><par n="s/izze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sliepe"><i>sl</i><par n="sl/iepe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dwaan"><i>d</i><par n="d/waan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="komme"><i>k</i><par n="k/omme__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sitte"><i>si</i><par n="si/tte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rinne"><i>r</i><par n="r/inne__vblex"/></e>
